Missouri, session 2026, HB3299.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 21, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 21.205, to read as follows:
21.205. Beginning with the general election in 2026, each newly elected member
2 of the general assembly shall be issued a calculator. Each calculator shall be
3 accompanied by an instruction booklet.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.